Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. In General

§ 26-15-101.
Scope of chapter.

This chapter applies to all insurance contracts and annuity contracts except:

Reinsurance;

Policies or contracts not issued for delivery in this state nor delivered in this state;

Wet marine and transportation insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 304; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-304; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Construction. —

In response to a certified question by the United States Court of Appeals for the Tenth Circuit the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 26-15-101(a)(ii) (2019) clearly and unambiguously provided that an insurance contract was “delivered” or “issued for delivery” in Wyoming if the policy issued was intended to protect an insured in Wyoming against risks in Wyoming. Sinclair Wyo. Ref. Co. v. Infrassure, Ltd., 2021 WY 65, 486 P.3d 990,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2021).

Applicability. —

Defendant was not entitled to an award of prejudgment interest or attorneys’ fees because the policies were issued in Texas, so the Wyoming insurance code was inapplicable. Lexington Ins. Co. v. Precision Drilling Co., L.P., 951 F.3d 1185, 2020 U.S. App. LEXIS 5810 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2020).

Quoted

in

State Sur. Co. v. Lamb Constr. Co., 625 P.2d 184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1981).

Stated

in

Mortgage Guar. Ins. Corp. v. Langdon, 634 P.2d 509,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 26-15-102.
Life insurance upon individual or person in whom he has insurable interest; “insurable interest” defined.

Any individual of competent legal capacity may procure or effect an insurance contract upon his own life or body for the benefit of any person. Except as provided in W.S.

26-15-103

, no person shall procure or cause to be procured any insurance contract upon the life or body of another individual unless the benefits under the contract are payable to the individual insured or his personal representatives, or to a person having, at the time when the contract is made, an insurable interest in the individual insured.

If the beneficiary, assignee or other payee under any contract made in violation of this section receives from the insurer any benefits thereunder accruing upon the death, disablement or injury of the individual insured, the individual insured or his executor or administrator, as the case may be, may maintain an action to recover the benefits from the person receiving them.

“Insurable interest” as to personal insurance means that any individual has an insurable interest in the life, body and health of himself, and of other persons as follows:

In the case of individuals related closely by blood or by law, a substantial interest engendered by love and affection;

In the case of other persons, a lawful and substantial economic interest in having the life, health or bodily safety of the individual insured continue, as distinguished from an interest arising only by, or enhanced in value by, the death, disablement or injury of the individual insured; and

An individual party to a contract or option for the purchase or sale of an interest in a business partnership or firm, or of shares of stock of a closed corporation or of an interest in those shares, has an insurable interest in the life of each individual party to the contract and for the purposes of the contract only, in addition to any insurable interest which otherwise exists as to that individual’s life.

An insurer may rely upon all statements, declarations and representations made by an applicant for insurance relative to the applicant’s insurable interest in the insured. No insurer incurs legal liability, except as set forth in the policy, by virtue of any untrue statements, declarations or representations relied upon in good faith.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 307; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-307; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-104

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Estoppel of, or waiver by, issuer of life insurance policy to assert defense of lack of insurable interest, 86 ALR4th 828.

Waiver or estoppel of insurer on basis of statements or omissions in promotional, illustrative, or explanatory materials given to insured, 63 ALR5th 427.

§ 26-15-103.
Life insurance for benefit of charitable institutions.

Contracts of life insurance may be made and entered into in which the person paying the consideration for the insurance has no insurable interest in the life of the person insured, if charitable, benevolent, educational or religious institutions are designated irrevocably as a beneficiary but not necessarily the primary beneficiary thereof.

In making a contract as specified in subsection (a) of this section, the person paying the premium shall make and sign the application therefor as owner and shall designate a charitable, benevolent, educational or religious institution irrevocably as the beneficiary or one (1) of the beneficiaries of the policy. The application also shall be signed by the person whose life is to be insured.

The contract is valid and binding among all of the parties thereto, notwithstanding that the owner has no insurable interest in the life of the person insured.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 308; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-308; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-105

; Laws 1982, ch. 5, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-104.
Insurable interest in property; “insurable interest” defined.

No contract of insurance of property or of any interest in property or arising from property is enforceable as to the insurance except for the benefit of persons having an insurable interest in the things insured at the time of the loss.

The measure of an insurable interest in property is the extent to which the insured might be directly or indirectly damnified by loss or impairment thereof.

“Insurable interest” as used in this section means any actual, lawful and substantial economic interest in the safety or preservation of the subject of the insurance free from loss, destruction or pecuniary damage or impairment.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 309; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-309; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-106

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Insurer's waiver of, or estoppel to assert, lack of insurable interest in property insured under fire policy, 91 ALR3d 513.

Right of mortgagee, who acquires title to mortgaged premises in satisfaction of mortgage, to recover, under fire insurance policy covering him as “mortgagee,” for loss or injury to property thereafter damaged or destroyed by fire, 19 ALR4th 778.

Duty of mortgagee of real property with respect to obtaining or maintenance of fire or other casualty insurance protecting mortgagor, 42 ALR4th 188.

Fire insurance: insurable interest of one expecting to inherit property or take by will, 52 ALR4th 1273.

Insurable interest in property of lessee with option to purchase property, 74 ALR4th 883.

§ 26-15-105.
Purchase of life insurance by or for minors or any person of competent legal capacity.

Any person of competent legal capacity may contract for insurance.

Any minor not less than fifteen (15) years of age, notwithstanding his minority, may contract for or own annuities, or insurance, or affirm by novation or otherwise preexisting contracts for annuities or insurance upon his own life, body, health, property, liabilities or other interests, or on the person of another in whom the minor has an insurable interest. The minor, notwithstanding his minority, may exercise all rights and powers with respect to or under any contract for annuity or for insurance upon his own life, body or health, or any contract the minor effects upon his own property, liabilities or other interests, or any contract the minor owns or effects on the person of another, as might be exercised by a person of full legal age, and may at any time surrender his interest in any such contracts and give valid discharge for any benefit accruing or money payable thereunder. The minor, by reason of his minority, is not entitled to rescind, avoid or repudiate the contract, nor to rescind, avoid or repudiate any exercise of a right or privilege thereunder, except that such a minor not otherwise emancipated is not bound by any unperformed agreement to pay, by promissory note or otherwise, any premium on any such annuity or insurance contract.

Any annuity contract or policy of life disability insurance procured by or for a minor under subsection (b) of this section, shall be made payable either to the minor or his estate or to a person having an insurable interest in the minor’s life.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 310; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-310; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Capacity of minor insured to effect a change of beneficiary, 14 ALR2d 375.

Power of guardian of incompetent to change beneficiary in ward's life insurance policy, 21 ALR2d 1191.

§ 26-15-106.
Application to be made by individual insured; exceptions.

No life or disability insurance contract upon an individual, except a contract of group life insurance or of group or blanket disability insurance, shall be made or carried out unless at the time of the making of the contract the individual insured, being of competent legal capacity to contract, applies therefor or has consented thereto in writing, except:

A spouse may carry out the insurance upon the other spouse;

Any person having an insurable interest in the life of a minor, or any person upon whom a minor is dependent for support and maintenance, may carry out insurance upon the life of or pertaining to the minor;

Family policies may be issued insuring any two (2) or more members of a family on an application signed by either parent, a stepparent or by a husband or wife.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 311; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-311; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-108

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-15-107.
Alteration of application prohibited; exceptions.

No alteration of any written application for any life or disability insurance policy shall be made by any person other than the applicant without his written consent, except that the insurer may make insertions for administrative purposes only in a manner as to indicate clearly that the insertions are not to be ascribed to the applicant.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 312; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-312; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-109

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-108.
Application as evidence.

No application for the issuance of any life or disability insurance policy or annuity contract is admissible in evidence in any action relative to the policy or contract, unless a true copy of the application is attached to or otherwise made a part of the policy or contract when issued. This provision does not apply to industrial life insurance policies.

If any life or disability insurance policy delivered in this state is reinstated or renewed, and the insured or the policy beneficiary or assignee makes written request to the insurer for a copy of the reinstatement or renewal application, if any, the insurer, within thirty (30) days after receipt of the request at its home office, shall deliver or mail to the person making the request a copy of the application reproduced by any legible means. If the copy is not delivered or mailed after having been requested, the insurer is precluded from introducing the application in evidence in any action or proceeding based upon or involving the policy or its reinstatement or renewal. In the case of a request from a beneficiary, the time within which the insurer is required to furnish a copy of the application does not begin to run until after receipt of evidence satisfactory to the insurer of the beneficiary’s vested interest in the policy or contract.

As to insurance other than life or disability insurance, no application for insurance signed by or on behalf of the insured is admissible in evidence in any action between the insured and the insurer arising out of the policy so applied for, if the insurer fails, at expiration of thirty (30) days after receipt of written demand therefor by or on behalf of the insured, to furnish to the insured a copy of the application reproduced by any legible means.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 313; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-313; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-110

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-109.
Statements in applications as representations and not as warranties; misrepresentations.

Any statements and descriptions in any application for an insurance policy or annuity contract, by or in behalf of the insured or annuitant, are representations and not warranties. Misrepresentations, omissions, concealment of facts and incorrect statements do not prevent a recovery under the policy or contract unless either:

Fraudulent; or

Material either to the acceptance of the risk, or to the hazard the insurer assumes; or

The insurer in good faith, if it knew the true facts as required by the application for the policy or contract or otherwise, would not have:

Issued the policy or contract;

Issued it at the same premium rate;

Issued a policy or contract in as large an amount; or

Provided coverage with respect to the hazard resulting in the loss.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 314; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-314; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-111

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

White v. Continental Gen. Ins. Co., 831 F. Supp. 1545, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14067 (D. Wyo. 1993); International Surplus Lines Ins. Co. v. University of Wyo. Research Corp., 850 F. Supp. 1509, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 5726 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Insured's misrepresentation or misstatement of marital status or relationship to beneficiary as ground for avoiding liability under life insurance policy, 14 ALR3d 931.

Insured's responsibility for false answers inserted by insurer's agent in application following correct answers by insured or for incorrect answers suggested by agent, 26 ALR3d 6.

Insured's statement, in application for life or health insurance, that he is in good health, as an absolute representation of, or mere statement of his good faith belief in, his good health, 26 ALR3d 1061.

Insured's misrepresentation or misstatement of name or marital status as ground for avoiding liability insurance, 27 ALR3d 849.

Materiality and effect of false statement by insurance applicant concerning previous insurance cancellations or rejections, 66 ALR3d 749.

Rescission or cancellation of insurance policy for insured's misrepresentation or concealment of information concerning human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) or related health problems, 15 ALR5th 92.

§ 26-15-110.
Filing and approval of application forms.

No basic insurance policy or annuity contract form, or application form if written application is required and is to be made a part of the policy or contract, or printed rider or endorsement form or form of renewal certificate, shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless the form is filed with and approved by the commissioner or is approved as provided in W.S.

26-15-201

. This provision does not apply to surety bonds, or to specially rated inland marine risks, nor to policies, riders, endorsements or forms of unique character designed for and used with relation to insurance upon a particular subject, or which relate to the manner of distribution of benefits or to the reservation of rights and benefits under life or disability insurance policies and are used at the request of the individual policyholder, contract holder or certificate holder. As to forms for use in property, marine, other than wet marine and transportation insurance, casualty and surety insurance coverages, the filing required by this subsection may be made by advisory and rating organizations on behalf of their members and subscribers. This provision does not prohibit any member or subscriber from filing the forms on its own behalf.

Any filing shall be made not less than forty-five (45) days in advance of any delivery. At the expiration of forty-five (45) days the form filed is approved unless affirmatively approved or disapproved by the commissioner’s order. Approval of any form by the commissioner constitutes a waiver of any unexpired portion of the waiting period. The commissioner may extend by not more than an additional forty-five (45) days the period within which he may affirmatively approve or disapprove any form, by giving notice to the insurer of the extension before expiration of the initial forty-five (45) day period. At the expiration of any extended period, and in the absence of prior affirmative approval or disapproval, any form is deemed approved. The commissioner, at any time, after notice and for cause shown, may withdraw any approval.

Any order of the commissioner disapproving a form or withdrawing a previous approval shall state the grounds and the particulars for the withdrawal in such detail as to reasonably inform the insurer. The withdrawal of a previously approved form is effective at the expiration of the period the commissioner prescribes in the notice, but not less than thirty (30) days from the date of the notice.

The commissioner, by order, may exempt from the requirements of this section for so long as he deems proper any insurance document or form or type thereof as specified in the order, to which, in his opinion:

This section may not practicably be applied;

The filing and approval of which are not desirable or necessary for the public’s protection; or

The document or form or type thereof has been approved under the provisions of the Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Compact as provided in W.S.

26-15-201

.

Appeals from the commissioner’s orders disapproving a form or withdrawing a previous approval may be taken as provided in W.S.

26-2-125

through

26-2-129

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 315; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-315; Laws 1975, ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-112

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1985, ch. 214, § 1; 1989, ch. 246, § 2; 2006, ch. 22, § 2.

Cross references. —

For definition of “commissioner,” see § 26-1-102(a)(viii).

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “or is approved as provided in W.S.

26-15-201

” in (a); added (d)(iii) and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 22, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2006.

Burden of proof for review of approved forms and rates. —

Once the filing of new policy forms and rates has become effective there arises a presumption of validity, which then makes it the burden of anyone, including the commissioner, complaining against those rates to show that they are wrong. Mortgage Guar. Ins. Corp. v. Langdon, 634 P.2d 509,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1981).

Burden on initial filing. —

In the case of a new filing of a policy form and rates, the burden of proof rests upon the party making the filing. Mortgage Guar. Ins. Corp. v. Langdon, 634 P.2d 509,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1981).

Where insurance companies enjoyed fair hearing. —

Mortgage insurance companies enjoyed a fair hearing to determine whether the approval previously given to policies should be withdrawn where they participated to the extent that they deemed desirable without any attempt made to inhibit testimony of witnesses or arguments of counsel, where all pertinent testimony was introduced, and where the commissioner participated patiently in hearing lengthy testimony. Mortgage Guar. Ins. Corp. v. Langdon, 634 P.2d 509,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1981).

Applied

in

State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 793 P.2d 1008,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Waiver or estoppel of insurer on basis of statements or omissions in promotional, illustrative, or explanatory materials given to insured, 63 ALR5th 427.

§ 26-15-111.
Filing and approval of application forms; grounds for disapproval.

The commissioner, within forty-five (45) days after filing of any insurance policy, shall disapprove any form filed under W.S.

26-15-110

, or withdraw any previous approval thereof, only if:

The form:

Is in any respect in violation of or does not comply with this code [title 26];

Contains or incorporates by reference, if the incorporation is otherwise permissible, any inconsistent, ambiguous or misleading clauses, or exceptions and conditions which deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in the general coverage of the contract;

Has any title, heading, or other indication of its provisions which is misleading; or

Is printed or otherwise reproduced in such manner as to render any provision of the form substantially illegible; or

He finds that:

The benefits provided in the policy are unreasonable in relation to the premiums charged; or

The rates or classification are excessive, inadequate or unfairly discriminatory. This paragraph does not apply to any policy form for insurance except those lines of insurance deemed noncompetitive under W.S.

26-14-101

through

26-14-118

.

If the commissioner disapproves the insurance policy, the insurer may request a hearing pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 316; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-316; Laws 1975, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-113

; Laws 1983, ch. 186, § 2; ch. 190, § 1.

Where insurance companies enjoyed fair hearing. —

Mortgage insurance companies enjoyed a fair hearing to determine whether the approval previously given to policies should be withdrawn where they participated to the extent that they deemed desirable without any attempt made to inhibit testimony of witnesses or arguments of counsel, where all pertinent testimony was introduced, and where the commissioner participated patiently in hearing lengthy testimony. Mortgage Guar. Ins. Corp. v. Langdon, 634 P.2d 509,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Plain Talk: Making NEPA Work,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 61 (1990).

§ 26-15-112.
Standard and uniform provisions of policies.

Insurance contracts shall contain any standard or uniform provisions required by the applicable provisions of this code [title 26] pertaining to contracts of particular kinds of insurance. The commissioner may waive the required use of a particular provision in a particular insurance policy form if:

He finds the provision unnecessary for the insured’s protection and inconsistent with the policy’s purposes; and

He otherwise approves the policy.

No policy shall contain any provision inconsistent with or contradictory to any standard or uniform provision used or required to be used, but the commissioner may approve any substitute provision which, in his opinion, is not less favorable in any particular to the insured or beneficiary than the provisions otherwise required.

Instead of the provisions required by this code for contracts for particular kinds of insurance, substantially similar provisions required by the law of the domicile of a foreign or alien insurer may be used if the commissioner approves.

A policy issued by a domestic insurer for delivery in another jurisdiction may contain any provision required or permitted by the laws of that jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 317; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-317; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-114

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-113.
Contents of policies generally.

Any policy shall specify:

The names of the parties to the contract;

The subject of the insurance;

The risks insured against;

The time when the insurance thereunder takes effect and the period during which the insurance is to continue;

The premium;

The conditions pertaining to the insurance;

Benefits payable, if a life or disability insurance contract.

The commissioner, by rule or regulation, may require a life insurer to show in life insurance policies, by reasonable itemization thereof, the amount of premium charged for optional, unique or particular material features or benefits included in or with the policy. The commissioner may also specify what portion of the charge by the insurer for or in connection with title insurance shall be set forth in the policy.

If under the policy the exact amount of premium is determinable only at stated intervals or upon termination of the contract, a statement of the basis and rates upon which the premium is to be determined and paid shall be included.

Subsections (a) through (c) of this section do not apply to surety contracts or to group insurance policies.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 318; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-318; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-115

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability insurance coverage as extending to particular losses, 91 ALR3d 921.

Who is “named insured” within meaning of automobile insurance coverage, 91 ALR3d 1280.

Liability policy providing coverage for damages because of injury to or destruction of property as covering injury to investments, 92 ALR3d 525.

Airport operations liability insurance, 92 ALR3d 1267.

Right of named beneficiary, upon change of beneficiary, to recover premiums paid on life insurance policy, 92 ALR3d 1330.

Who is “resident” or “member” of same “household” or “family” as named insured, within liability insurance provision, 93 ALR3d 420.

Construction and application of provision in health or hospitalization policy excluding or postponing coverage of prior illness, 94 ALR3d 990.

Scope of clause excluding from contractor's or similar liability policy damage to property in care, custody, or control of insured, 8 ALR4th 563.

Construction, application, and effect of clause that liability insurance policy may be canceled by insured by mailing to insurer written notice stating when thereafter such cancellation shall be effective, 11 ALR4th 456.

Resolution of conflicts, in nonautomobile liability insurance policies, between excess or pro-rata “other insurance” clauses, 12 ALR4th 993.

Liability insurance: misstatement by insured, later withdrawn or corrected, as breach of cooperation clause, 13 ALR4th 837.

Right of “named insured” in automobile insurance policy to delete coverage on nonowned automobile or other vehicle without notice to owner or operator thereof, 13 ALR4th 905.

Liability insurance coverage as extending to liability for punitive or exemplary damages, 16 ALR4th 11.

Liability insurer's waiver of right, or estoppel, to set up breach of co-operation clause, 30 ALR4th 620.

Validity and construction of “sistership” clause of products liability insurance policy excepting from coverage cost of product recall or withdrawal of product from market, 32 ALR4th 630.

Criminal conviction as rendering conduct for which insured convicted within provision of liability insurance policy expressly excluding coverage for damage or injury intended or expected by insured, 35 ALR4th 1063.

What constitutes “legal representative” or “personal representative” entitled to receive insurance proceeds on account of loss suffered by deceased, 40 ALR4th 255.

Property damage resulting from inadequate or improper design or construction of dwelling as within coverage of “all risks” homeowner's insurance policy, 41 ALR4th 1095.

Partnership or joint venture exclusion in contractor's or other similar comprehensive general liability insurance policy, 57 ALR4th 1155.

Policy provision limiting time within which action may be brought on the policy as applicable to tort action by insured against insurer, 66 ALR4th 859.

Event triggering liability insurance coverage as occurring within period of time covered by liability insurance policy where injury or damage is delayed—modern cases, 14 ALR5th 695.

Liability policy coverage for insured's injury to third party's investments, anticipated profits, goodwill, or the like, unaccompanied by physical property damage, 18 ALR5th 187.

Validity and operation of “step-down” provision of automobile liability policy reducing coverage for permissive users, 29 ALR5th 469.

What constitutes medical or surgical treatment, or the like, within exclusionary clause of accident policy or accidental death feature of life policy, 56 ALR5th 471.

Negligent misrepresentation as “accident” or “occurrence” warranting insurance coverage, 58 ALR5th 483.

Who is a “parent” entitled to proceeds of serviceman's group life insurance, where there are no named beneficiaries, and no surviving widow or children, under 38 USC § 770(a), 73 ALR Fed 135.

§ 26-15-114.
Additional policy contents.

A policy may contain additional provisions not inconsistent with this code and which are:

Required to be inserted by the laws of the insurer’s domicile;

Necessary, because of the manner in which the insurer is constituted or operated, in order to state the rights and obligations of the parties to the contract; or

Desired by the insurer and neither prohibited by law nor in conflict with any provisions required to be included therein.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 319; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-319; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-116

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to in this section, see § 26-1-102(a)(xxxii).

§ 26-15-115.
Adoption of charter and bylaws by reference prohibited.

No policy shall contain any provision purporting to make any portion of the charter, bylaws or other constituent document of the insurer, other than the subscriber’s agreement or power of attorney of a reciprocal insurer, a part of the contract unless that portion is set forth in full in the policy. Any policy provision in violation of this section is invalid.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 320; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-320; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-117

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-116.
Execution of policies.

Any insurance policy shall be executed in the name of and on behalf of the insurer by its authorized officer, attorney-in-fact, employee or other representative.

A facsimile signature of any executing individual may be used instead of an original signature.

No insurance contract which is otherwise valid shall be rendered invalid by reason of the apparent execution thereof on behalf of the insurer by the imprinted facsimile signature of an individual not authorized to execute as of the date of the policy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 321; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-321; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-118

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-117.
Underwriters' and combination policies.

Two (2) or more authorized insurers may jointly issue, and are jointly and severally liable on, an underwriters’ policy bearing their names. Any insurer may issue a policy in the name of an underwriters’ department, and the policy shall plainly show the insurer’s true name.

Two (2) or more insurers, with the commissioner’s approval, may issue a combination policy which shall contain provisions substantially as follows:

That the insurers executing the policy are severally liable for the full amount of any loss or damage, according to the terms of the policy, or for specified percentages or amounts thereof, aggregating the full amount of insurance under the policy; and

That service of process or of any notice or proof of loss required by the policy, upon any of the insurers executing the policy, constitutes service upon all the insurers.

This section does not apply to cosurety obligations.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 322; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-322; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-119

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

§ 26-15-118.
Validity and construction of noncomplying policies.

Any policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state in violation of this code [title 26], but otherwise binding on the insurer, is valid, but shall be construed as provided in this code.

Any condition, omission or provision not in compliance with this code and contained in any policy, rider or endorsement, otherwise valid, is not thereby invalid but shall be construed and applied in accordance with the condition, omission or provision as would have applied if it had been in full compliance with this code.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 323; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-323; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-120

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-119.
Binders and other contracts for temporary insurance.

Binders or other contracts for temporary insurance may be made orally or in writing and include all the usual terms of the policy as to which the binder is given together with applicable endorsements as are designated in the binder, except as superseded by the terms of the binder.

No binder is valid beyond the issuance of the policy with respect to which it is given, or beyond ninety (90) days from its effective date, whichever period is shorter.

If the policy is not issued, a binder may be extended or renewed beyond the ninety (90) days with the commissioner’s written approval or in accordance with rules and regulations relative thereto the commissioner promulgates.

This section does not apply to life or disability insurances.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 324; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-324; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-121

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Temporary fire, wind or hail insurance pending issuance of policy, 14 ALR3d 568.

§ 26-15-120.
Delivery of policy; duplicate policies.

If the original policy is delivered or is required to be delivered to or for deposit with any vendor, mortgagee or pledgee of any motor vehicle, and in which policy any interest of the vendee, mortgagor or pledgor in or with reference to the vehicle is insured, a duplicate of the policy setting forth the name and address of the insurer, insurance classification of vehicle, type of coverage, limits of liability, premiums for the types of coverage, and duration of the policy, or memorandum thereof containing the same information, shall be delivered by the vendor, mortgagee or pledgee to each vendee, mortgagor or pledgor named in the policy or coming within the group of persons designated in the policy to be included. If the policy does not provide coverage of legal liability for injury to persons or damage to the property of third parties, a statement of that fact shall be printed, written or stamped conspicuously on the face of the duplicate policy or memorandum. This section does not apply to inland marine floater policies.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 325; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-325; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-122

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-121.
Renewal by certificate or endorsement.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any insurance policy terminating by its terms at a specified expiration date, and not otherwise renewable, may be renewed or extended:

At the insurer’s option;

Upon a currently authorized policy form and at the premium rate then required for the policy;

For a specific additional period by certificates or by policy endorsement; and

Without requiring the issuance of a new policy.

A private health benefit plan as defined in W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xxxiii), shall be renewable with respect to all insureds at the option of the insured except in the following cases:

Nonpayment of the required premiums;

Fraud or misrepresentation by the insured; or

In the event the insurer elects not to renew an individual private health insurance plan, it may do so only if it elects not to renew all of its individual private health insurance benefit plans issued in this state. In the event the insurer elects not to renew a group private health benefit plan, it may do so only if it elects not to renew all of its group private health benefit plans issued in this state. In either case, the insurer shall:

Provide notice of the decision not to renew coverage to all affected private health benefit plans and to all affected individually insured persons at least one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the nonrenewal of all health benefit plans by the insurer; and

Provide notice of its decision under this paragraph to the commissioner at least three (3) working days prior to providing the notice required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 326; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-326; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-123

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1995, ch. 93, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Insured's right of action for arbitrary nonrenewal of policy, where insurer has option not to renew, 37 ALR4th 862.

§ 26-15-122.
Assignment of policies.

A policy is assignable or not assignable as provided by its terms. Subject to its terms relating to assignability, any life or disability policy, under the terms of which the beneficiary may be changed upon the sole request of the insured or owner, may be assigned either by pledge or transfer of title, by an assignment executed by the insured or owner alone and delivered to the insurer, whether or not the pledgee or assignee is the insurer. The assignment entitles the insurer to deal with the assignee as the owner or pledgee of the policy in accordance with the terms of the assignment, until the insurer receives at its home office written notice of termination of the assignment or pledge, or written notice by or on behalf of some other person claiming some interest in the policy in conflict with the assignment.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 327; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-327; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-124

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-15-123.
Payment discharges insurer.

If the proceeds of or payments under any life or disability insurance policy or annuity contract are payable in accordance with the terms of the policy or contract, or the exercise of any right or privilege thereunder, and the insurer makes payment thereof in accordance with those terms or in accordance with any written assignment thereof, the person then designated as being entitled thereto is entitled to receive the proceeds or payments and to give full acquittance therefor. The payments fully discharge the insurer from all claims under the policy or contract unless, before payment is made, the insurer receives at its home office written notice by or on behalf of some other person that the other person claims to be entitled to the payment or some interest in the policy or contract.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 328; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-328; W.S. 1977, §

26-15-125

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.